New York, session 2025-2026, S1200.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 22. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "veteran" means a 4 resident of this state, who has served in the active military or naval 5 service of the United States, and who has been released from such 6 service under honorable conditions, or who has been furloughed to the 7 reserve, or has resumed service back in the New York State Army National 8 Guard, New York Air National Guard, or New York Naval Militia. 9 (b) Every veteran who is enrolled on a full-time basis as an under- 10 graduate student in good standing, at an institution within the state 11 university system, shall upon application be granted academic credits 12 without limitation towards such veteran's degree for completion of 13 courses that were part of such veteran's military training or service if 14 the completed courses meet the standards of the American council on 15 education or its equivalent for the awarding of academic credits. No 16 fee, tuition or other charge shall be assessed against a veteran who 17 qualifies for such credit pursuant to this subdivision. 18 (c) The board of trustees shall adopt such procedures as are necessary 19 to fully implement the provisions of this subdivision. 20 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 21 subdivision 24 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01898-01-5 S. 1200 2 1 24. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, the term "veteran" means a 2 resident of this state, who has served in the active military or naval 3 service of the United States, and who has been released from such 4 service under honorable conditions, or who has been furloughed to the 5 reserve, or has resumed service back in the New York State Army National 6 Guard, New York Air National Guard, or New York Naval Militia. 7 (b) Every veteran who is enrolled on a full-time basis as an under- 8 graduate student in good standing, at an institution within the city 9 university system, shall upon application be granted academic credits 10 without limitation towards such veteran's degree for completion of 11 courses that were part of such veteran's military training or service if 12 the completed courses meet the standards of the American council on 13 education or its equivalent for the awarding of academic credits. No 14 fee, tuition or other charge shall be assessed against a veteran who 15 qualifies for such credit pursuant to this subdivision. 16 (c) The board of trustees shall adopt such procedures as are necessary 17 to fully implement the provisions of this subdivision. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 19 the date on which it shall have become a law.